Washington statutes.
RCW 39.104.100

Application process—Approval of project awards by the approving agency.

(1) Prior to applying to receive a state contribution, a sponsoring local government must adopt a revitalization area within the limitations in RCW 39.104.050 and in accordance with RCW 39.104.040.

(2)(a) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.510, a sponsoring local government must apply and be approved for a project award amount. The application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the approving agency and include, but not be limited to:

(i) Information establishing that over the period of time that the local sales and use tax will be imposed under RCW 82.14.510, increases in state and local property, sales, and use tax revenues as a result of public improvements in the revitalization area will be equal to or greater than the respective state and local contributions made under this chapter;

(ii) Information demonstrating that the sponsoring local government will meet the requirements necessary to receive the full amount of state contribution it is requesting on an annual basis;

(iii) The amount of state contribution it is requesting;

(iv) The anticipated effective date for imposing the tax under RCW 82.14.510;

(v) The estimated number of years that the tax will be imposed;

(vi) The anticipated rate of tax to be imposed under RCW 82.14.510, subject to the rate-setting conditions in RCW 82.14.510(3), should the sponsoring local government be approved for a project award; and

(vii) The anticipated date when bonds under RCW 39.104.110 will be issued.

(b) The approving agency must make available electronic forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the application, each applicant must provide to the department a copy of the adopted ordinance creating the revitalization area as required in RCW 39.104.040, copies of any adopted interlocal agreements from participating local governments, and any notices from taxing districts that elect not to be a participating taxing district.

(3)(a) Project awards must be determined on:

(i) The availability of a state contribution;

(ii) Whether the sponsoring local government would be able to generate enough tax revenue under RCW 82.14.510 to generate the amount of project award requested;

(iii) The number of jobs created;

(iv) The fit of the expected business creation or expansion within the region's preferred economic growth strategy;

(v) The speed with which the project can begin construction; and

(vi) The extent to which the project leverages nonstate funds.

(b) The total of all project awards may not exceed the annual state contribution limit.

(c) If the level of available state contribution is less than the amount requested by the next available applicant, the applicant must be given the first opportunity to accept the lesser amount of state contribution but only if the applicant produces a new application within sixty days of being notified by the approving agency and the application describes the impact on the proposed project as a result of the lesser award in addition to new application information outlined in subsection (2) of this section.

(d) Applications that are not approved for a project award due to lack of available state contribution must be retained on file by the approving agency.

(e)(i) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection, once total project awards reach the amount of annual state contribution limit, no more applications will be accepted.

(ii) Any city or county that has been approved for a project award by the department prior to January 1, 2011, and has not imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.510 by December 31, 2016, must forfeit their project award. However, amounts will not be forfeited if a city or county has sent the department a letter indicating its intent to impose the sales and use tax by July 1, 2022, before July 1, 2016. Amounts forfeited under this section must be made available for new applications under subsection (5) of this section.

(f) If the annual contribution limit is increased by making additional funds available for applicants or if funds become available from project awards forfeited under (e)(ii) of this subsection, applications will be accepted again as described in subsection (5) of this section.

(4) The approving agency must notify the sponsoring local government of approval or denial of a project award within sixty days of the approving agency's receipt of the sponsoring local government's application. Determination of a project award by the approving agency is final. Notification must include the earliest date when the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.510 may be imposed, subject to conditions in chapter 82.14 RCW. The project award notification must specify the rate requested in the application and any adjustments to the rate that would need to be made based on the project award and rate restrictions in RCW 82.14.510. The department of commerce must consult with the department of revenue in determining the amount of a project award.

(5) The department of commerce must begin accepting applications and approving project awards under this section on and after June 9, 2016. The department of commerce must notify the department of all approved project awards under this section. The department of commerce must also provide to the department any information necessary to implement the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.510.

[ 2016 c 207 s 2; 2010 c 164 s 6; 2009 c 270 s 401.]